Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 2 Procedure

29-3-105.
“Conservatorship” defined; petition for transfer of jurisdiction; requirements of petition.

For purposes of this part and Part 3 of this article, the term “conservatorship” refers to a legal relationship in which a person is given responsibility by a court of competent jurisdiction for the care of the property of a minor, thereby becoming a conservator.

A conservator who has been appointed by a foreign court of competent jurisdiction may petition to have the conservatorship transferred to and accepted in this state by filing a petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign conservatorship in the court of the county in this state where the minor resides or may reside.

The petition shall include the following:

An authenticated copy of the foreign conservatorship order, including:

All attachments describing the duties and powers of the conservator; and

All amendments or modifications to the foreign conservatorship order entered subsequent to the original order, including any order to transfer the conservatorship;

The address of the foreign court which issued the conservatorship order;

A listing of any other conservatorship petitions that are pending in any jurisdiction and the names and addresses of the courts where the petitions have been filed;

The petitioner’s name, address, and county of domicile;

The name, age, and current address of the minor;

The names and current addresses of the adult siblings of the minor, if any;

The name and address of the person responsible for the care and custody of the minor, if other than the petitioner, and of any other conservator currently serving;

The name and address of any currently acting legal representative, other than the petitioner, including any legal counsel, guardian ad litem, or court visitor appointed by the foreign court for the minor;

The name and address of the minor’s guardian, if any;

The name and address of the surety on the conservator’s bond;

The reason the transfer is in the minor’s best interest; and

To the extent known to the petitioner, a statement of the location and estimated value of the minor’s property and the source and amount of any anticipated income or receipts.

The petition may be combined with other petitions related to the conservatorship, including a petition to modify the terms of the conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-106.
Notice and other procedural requirements.

Notice and a copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign conservatorship shall be served personally on the minor. The notice shall:

State that the minor has a right to a hearing on the petition;

Inform the minor of the procedure to exercise the minor’s right to a hearing; and

State that the minor has the right to independent legal counsel and that the court shall appoint legal counsel for the minor unless the minor has retained counsel or legal counsel has been appointed by the foreign court to represent the minor in the transfer of the conservatorship.

Notice and a copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign conservatorship shall be provided to the court from which the conservatorship is to be transferred. Notice to the foreign court shall include a request that the foreign court:

Certify whether:

The foreign court has any record that the conservator has engaged in malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance during the conservator’s appointment;

Periodic reports have been filed in a satisfactory manner; and

All bond or other security requirements imposed under the conservatorship have been performed;

Forward copies of all documents filed with the foreign court relating to the conservatorship, including but not limited to:

The initial petition for conservatorship and other filings relevant to the appointment of the conservator;

Reports and recommendations of guardians ad litem, court visitors, or other individuals appointed by the foreign court to evaluate the appropriateness of the conservatorship;

Reports of physical and mental health practitioners describing the condition of the minor;

Periodic status reports on the condition of the minor and the minor’s assets; and

The order to transfer the conservatorship, if any.

Notice and a copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign conservatorship shall be mailed to all other persons named in the petition by first-class mail. The notice shall inform these persons of their right to object to the receipt and acceptance of the conservatorship by this state.

The minor shall have 30 days from the date of service of the petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign conservator to request a hearing on the petition. All other persons to whom notice is given under this Code section shall have 30 days from the mailing of the notice to request a hearing on the petition.

The court may waive the notice requirements of subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section if:

The conservator has filed a petition in the foreign court for transfer and release of the conservatorship to this state;

Notice was given to the minor and all interested persons in conjunction with the petition for transfer and release of the conservatorship;

The petitioner provides the court with an authenticated copy of the petition for transfer and release of the conservatorship filed with the foreign court and proof that service was made on the minor not more than 90 days from the date the petition for receipt and acceptance of the conservatorship is filed in the court; and

The minor is represented by legal counsel with respect to the petition in the foreign court.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-107.
Hearing.

Upon the court’s own motion or upon timely motion by the minor or by any interested person, the court shall hold a hearing to consider the petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign conservator.

If any interested person challenges the validity of the foreign conservator or the authority of the foreign court to appoint the conservator, the court may stay this proceeding while the petitioner is afforded the opportunity to have the foreign court hear the challenge and determine its merits.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-107

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-108.
Required findings prior to granting foreign conservatorship; inventory; applicable law; orderly transfer.

The court may grant a petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign conservatorship provided the court finds that:

The conservator is presently in good standing with the foreign court; and

The transfer of the conservatorship from the foreign jurisdiction is in the best interest of the minor.

The court may require the conservator to file an inventory of the minor’s property at the time of the transfer from the foreign jurisdiction.

Subject to subsection (d) of this Code section, at all times following the entry of the order accepting the guardianship, the laws of the State of Georgia shall apply to the conservatorship.

In order to coordinate efforts with the foreign court to facilitate the orderly transfer of the conservatorship, the court is authorized to:

Delay the effective date of the receipt and acceptance for a reasonable period of time;

Make the receipt and acceptance contingent upon the release of the conservatorship or the termination of the conservatorship and the discharge of the conservator in the foreign jurisdiction;

Recognize concurrent jurisdiction over the conservatorship for a reasonable period of time to permit the foreign court to release the conservatorship or to terminate the conservatorship and discharge the conservator in the foreign jurisdiction; or

Make other arrangements the court deems necessary to effectuate the receipt and acceptance of the conservatorship.

The denial of a petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign conservatorship does not affect the right of a conservator appointed by a foreign court of competent jurisdiction to petition for conservatorship under Code Section 29-3-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-108

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.